test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-МО_Ф-конь_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - конь M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      конь+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: ко́нь
      конь+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Anim: коня́
      конь+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: коня́
      конь+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: коне́
      конь+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: коню́
      конь+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: конём
      конь+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: ко́ни
      конь+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Anim: коне́й
      конь+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: коне́й
      конь+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: коня́х
      конь+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: коня́м
      конь+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: коня́ми
